North Carolina, session 2025, SB278.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 25A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-375.25. Cardiac emergency response plans.
(a) The governing body of each public school unit shall develop a cardiac emergency
response plan (CERP) that addresses the appropriate use of school personnel to respond to
incidents involving individuals experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening
emergency while on school grounds. The CERP shall integrate evidence-based core elements,
such as those recommended by the American Heart Association or nationally recognized
recommendations or core elements. At a minimum, the CERP shall contain the following core
elements:
(1) Establish a cardiac emergency response team.
(2) Describe how the response team will be activated in response to a cardiac
emergency.
(3) Identify the school staff that will receive annual training on cardiopulmonary
resuscitation (CPR) and use of Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs). At
a minimum, school nurses and any faculty with supervisory responsibility
over students in any athletic situation shall be included in this training.
(4) Annual practice drills for the response team.
(5) Integrating local emergency service providers with the plan.
(b) The CERP shall be reviewed and updated annually.
(c) School officials shall work directly with local emergency service providers to
integrate the CERP into the community's EMS responder protocols.
(d) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the installation, use, and
maintenance of AEDs in public school units. At a minimum, the rules shall include provisions
for the following:
(1) Installation and placement of at least one AED in each school in a public
school unit.
(2) Appropriate AED placement shall be determined from guidelines set by the
American Heart Association or an organization focused on emergency
cardiovascular care but, at a minimum, shall be identified with appropriate
*S278-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
signage, be in an unlocked location, and able to be placed on a victim within
three minutes.
(3) Implementation of an appropriate training course for public school personnel
in the use of AEDs, including the role of cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR)
and first aid.
(4) Proper maintenance and testing of the AEDs.
(5) Coordination with appropriate licensed professionals in the oversight of
training on the AEDs."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) Cardiac emergency response plan (CERP). – Local boards of education shall
adopt a CERP, including the installation, maintenance, and use of automatic
external defibrillators in accordance with G.S. 115C-375.25."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(37) Cardiac emergency response plan (CERP). – The board of trustees shall adopt
a CERP, including the installation, maintenance, and use of automatic external
defibrillators in accordance with G.S. 115C-375.25."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) Cardiac emergency response plan (CERP). – Charter schools shall adopt a CERP,
including the installation, maintenance, and use of automatic external defibrillators in accordance
with G.S. 115C-375.25."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Cardiac emergency response plan (CERP). – Regional schools shall adopt a
CERP, including the installation, maintenance, and use of automatic external
defibrillators in accordance with G.S. 115C-375.25."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(15) Cardiac emergency response plan (CERP). – The Board of Governors shall
adopt a CERP, including the installation, maintenance, and use of automatic
external defibrillators in accordance with G.S. 115C-375.25, for any public
secondary schools under the Board's jurisdiction."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to the governing
body of each public school unit to support the schools in purchasing AEDs, developing cardiac
emergency response plans as required under G.S. 115C-375.25, as enacted by this act, and
developing emergency action plans under G.S. 115C-407.58.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 278-First Edition